Nevada, session 83, SB399.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 417.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
417.210 1. A veteran who is eligible for interment in a
national cemetery pursuant to the provisions of 38 U.S.C. § 2402 is
eligible for interment in a veterans’ cemetery in this State.
2. An eligible veteran, or a member of his or her immediate
family, or a veterans’ organization recognized by the Director may
-
*SB399*

– 2 –
apply for a plot in a cemetery for veterans in this State by submitting
a request to the cemetery superintendent on a form to be supplied by
the cemetery superintendent. The application for interment must
provide for a selection to have the area immediately above and
surrounding the interred remains of the applicant landscaped with
natural grass or xeriscaping. The cemetery superintendent shall
assign available plots in the order in which applications are
received. A specific plot may not be reserved before it is needed for
burial. No charge may be made for a plot or for the interment of a
veteran.
3. One plot is allowed for the interment of each eligible veteran
and for each member of his or her immediate family, except where
the conditions of the soil or the number of the decedents of the
family requires more than one plot.
4. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
Director shall charge a fee for the interment of a family member, but
the fee may not exceed the actual cost of interment. The Director
shall not charge a fee for the interment of the spouse of a veteran.
5. As used in this section, “immediate family” means the
spouse, minor child or, when the Director deems appropriate, the
unmarried adult child of an eligible veteran.
H
-
*SB399*